Idaho statutes. Title 46 MILITIA AND MILITARY AFFAIRS
Chapter 11 IDAHO CODE OF MILITARY JUSTICE
§ 46-1103. Arrest.

Arrest of members of the Idaho military not in federal service by members of the Idaho military while acting in their military capacity is prohibited, except in the following circumstances:

If any member fails or refuses to report to his appointed place of duty, his commanding officer in the rank of major or above is authorized to arrest or cause to be arrested such member and have him brought before the commanding officer at his unit or organization headquarters, whether such headquarters be located within or without the borders of the state. After such an arrest, the commanding officer is authorized to transport, or cause to be transported, such member to his appointed place of duty, whether within or without the borders of the state. Furthermore, if a commander, in the rank of major or above, finds that probable cause exists to believe that a minor offense has been committed by a member of his command, he may cause the member to be arrested and brought before him for the purpose of processing nonjudicial punishment under article 15 of the model state code of military justice as provided in section 46-1102, Idaho Code. If military personnel are not available for the purpose of making the arrest or if the officer ordering the arrest deems it advisable, he may issue a warrant to any sheriff or peace officer authorized to serve warrants of arrest, and such sheriff or peace officer shall serve such warrants of arrest immediately, whenever practicable, and make return thereof to the commanding officer issuing the warrant. Upon receipt of the notification of arrest, the commanding officer shall direct that the arrestee be retrieved and brought before him within a reasonable time. Warrants issued under this subsection shall be the equivalent of a misdemeanor warrant issued by a court of the state of Idaho.

If any member of the Idaho military has had charges preferred against him under this chapter, and the convening authority to whom the charges have been forwarded has found that probable cause exists that the offense was committed by the accused and that the incarceration of the accused pending court-martial is required because of special circumstances found to exist which warrant such incarceration, then the convening authority is authorized to arrest such member or cause him to be arrested and have him confined pending trial. If military personnel are not available for the purpose of making the arrest, or if the convening authority deems it advisable, he may issue a warrant to any sheriff or peace officer authorized to serve such warrant in the same manner as other warrants of arrest, and said sheriff or peace officer shall effect the arrest and hold the accused in the county jail of the county in which the arrest is effected. Upon receipt of the notification of arrest, in accordance with the provisions of section 46-1102, Idaho Code, the commanding officer may direct that the arrestee be retrieved and brought before him within a reasonable time. Warrants issued under this subsection shall be the equivalent of a felony warrant issued by a court of the state of Idaho.

§ 46-1104. Regulatory authority.

The adjutant general shall have authority to promulgate such regulations as he deems necessary and proper to carry out the intent of this code.

§ 46-1105. Immunity.

All persons acting under the provisions of this chapter, whether as a member of the military or as a civilian, shall be immune from any personal liability for any of their acts or omissions which they did or failed to do as part of their duties under this chapter.

§ 46-1106. Severability.

The provisions of this act are hereby declared to be severable and if any provision of this act or the application of such provision to any person or circumstance is declared invalid for any reason, such declaration shall not affect the validity of the remaining portions of this act.